Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.210

Water safety day.

On the day recognized as water safety day under RCW 1.16.050, individuals who work directly with children, from infants to age 18, in their profession are encouraged to provide training, educational materials, and other resources to the children and their families around water safety, water rescue, and drowning prevention, including a list of locations where caregivers can access swimming lessons for their children.

[ 2023 c 181 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—2023 c 181: See notes following RCW 1.16.050.